Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 2. Good Conduct Allowances for Persons Committed Prior to
July 1, 1981.

§ 53.1-192.
Applicability of article.

The provisions of this article shall be applicable only to those persons who were convicted, sentenced and committed to the Department prior to July 1, 1981, and who, in accordance with §

53.1-198

, are not governed by the system of good conduct allowances established in Article 3 (§

53.1-198

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-193.
Good conduct credits for persons convicted prior to October 1, 1942; effect of credit upon eligibility for parole.

Every person convicted of a felony before October 1, 1942, except those referenced in §

53.1-194

, shall, for every month that he is held in confinement after June 24, 1944, in any state correctional facility, without violating any prison rule or regulation, be allowed a credit of thirty days upon the total term of confinement to which he has been sentenced, in addition to the time he actually serves. Any credit allowed under the provisions of this section shall also be considered as reducing the term of imprisonment to which the prisoner was or is sentenced for the purpose of determining his eligibility for parole.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-210; 1979, c. 415; 1982, c. 636.

Law Review.

For survey of the law in the Fourth Circuit on habeas corpus and prisoner’s rights, see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 625 (1977).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 83.

§ 53.1-194.
Good conduct credits for prisoners committing crimes, pardon violators and escapees convicted prior to October 1, 1942; effect of credit upon eligibility for parole.

Every person convicted of a felony before October 1, 1942, who had once before been convicted of a felony and regularly discharged from the state corrections system, or who, prior to June 24, 1944, had been returned to a state correctional facility for violating the terms of a conditional pardon, or who had been convicted of a crime while serving his sentence in a state correctional facility, or who had escaped or attempted to escape from a state correctional facility or from a local correctional facility while awaiting trial or transfer to a state correctional facility, shall, for every month he is confined in any state correctional facility after such date, without violating any prison rule or regulation, be allowed a credit of fifteen days upon the total term of confinement to which he has been sentenced, in addition to the time he actually serves. Every person convicted of a felony before October 1, 1942, who is returned thereafter to a state correctional facility for violating the terms of a conditional pardon, or who commits a crime while serving his sentence in a state correctional facility, or who escapes or attempts to escape from a state correctional facility, shall, for every twenty days he is held in confinement after his return to a state correctional facility or after the commission of such crime, or after such escape or attempted escape, without violating any prison rule or regulation, be allowed a credit of only ten days upon the total term of confinement to which he has been sentenced, in addition to the time he actually serves.

Any credit allowed under the provisions of this section shall also be considered as reducing the term of imprisonment to which the prisoner was or is sentenced for the purpose of determining his eligibility for parole.

So much of an order of any court contrary to the provisions of this section shall be deemed null and void.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-211; 1952, c. 142; 1979, c. 415; 1982, c. 636.

Law Review.

For survey of the law in the Fourth Circuit on habeas corpus and prisoner’s rights, see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 625 (1977).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 83.

§ 53.1-195.
Credits earned prior to 1944.

Such credit as any person may have earned pursuant to §

53.1-193

or §

53.1-194

and not forfeited prior to June 24, 1944, shall remain to his credit, unless forfeited as hereinafter provided.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-212; 1982, c. 636.

Law Review.

For survey of the law in the Fourth Circuit on habeas corpus and prisoner’s rights, see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 625 (1977).

§ 53.1-196.
Good conduct credits of persons convicted after October 1, 1942; effect of credit upon eligibility for parole.

Every person convicted of a felony on or after October 1, 1942 and every person convicted of a misdemeanor and confined in any state correctional facility shall, for every twenty days of confinement after sentence, either in a local correctional facility awaiting transfer to the Department or in any state correctional facility serving the sentence imposed upon him, without violation of any written jail or prison rule or regulation, be allowed a credit of ten days upon his total term of confinement to which he has been sentenced, in addition to the time he actually serves. So much of the credit allowed to misdemeanants by this section as applies to time served prior to June 24, 1944, shall be in lieu of, and not in addition to, any credit they may have earned under the law as it existed prior to such date.

Any credit allowed under the provisions of this section shall also be considered as reducing the term of imprisonment to which the prisoner was or is sentenced for the purpose of determining his eligibility for parole.

So much of an order of any court contrary to the provisions of this section shall be deemed null and void.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-213; 1970, c. 648; 1972, c. 487; 1973, c. 208; 1974, c. 533; 1977, c. 182; 1982, c. 636.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 83.

§ 53.1-197.
Credit allowed for career and technical educational or other educational training.

Every person sentenced to the Department, while in a local or state correctional facility, who participates in career and technical education or other training while confined, or who shows such interest and application in his work assignment as to exhibit unusual progress toward rehabilitation, may, in the discretion of the Director be allowed a credit toward his parole eligibility date and upon the total term of confinement to which he has been sentenced. Such credit may be from one day to five days for each month he has been engaged in such career and technical education or other training or has applied himself in excess of minimal work assignment requirements. Any credit accumulated prior to June 1, 1975, toward the term of confinement may, in the discretion of the Director, be credited toward such prisoner’s parole eligibility date.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-213.1; 1968, c. 302; 1973, c. 204; 1975, c. 244; 1976, c. 180; 1982, c. 636; 2001, c. 483.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3 provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4 provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5 provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical education or other” for “vocational or educational” in two places.

§ 53.1-197.1.
Limitation upon applicability of this article.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any sentence imposed upon a conviction of a felony offense committed on or after January 1, 1995.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2.